Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1526.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The State Department of Energy shall apply to the Environmental Res-
toration Council, established under ORS 541.861, for grant moneys from the State Agency
Program Fund, established under ORS 541.867, and may also apply for moneys from other
sources, for the purpose of covering:
(a) The department’s costs and expenses in carrying out subsection (2) of this section;
and
(b) The organizational, startup and administrative costs of the founding board convened
under subsection (2) of this section in carrying out subsection (5) of this section.
(2) If the department secures grant moneys in a sufficient amount, but not less than $2
million, the department shall carry out pre-startup activities to include convening a founding
board and filling the founding board’s membership, as described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(3)(a) The founding board convened under subsection (2) of this section must consist of
at least eight members as follows:
(A) The Director of the State Department of Energy;
(B) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department or the director’s
designee;
(C) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department or the director’s
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 226

A-Eng. SB 1526
designee;
(D) Four members who represent nongovernmental organizations; and
(E) One member who represents a labor organization.
(b) The members of the founding board described in paragraph (a)(D) and (E) of this
subsection must:
(A) Have expertise in one or more of the following subjects:
(i) Financing at a local government, community development financial institution, credit
union, community bank or similar institution;
(ii) Energy utilities;
(iii) Clean energy projects, energy efficiency, zero-emissions transportation and technol-
ogies;
(iv) State infrastructure, community development and resilience and extreme weather
events;
(v) Investment fund management; or
(vi) Clean energy and resilience programs and the deployment of clean energy technolo-
gies; and
(B) Have a diverse range of perspectives, lived experiences and expertise that represent:
(i) The different geographical regions of this state;
(ii) Lower income, tribal, rural or underserved communities;
(iii) Commercial enterprises in the clean energy or resiliency sector; or
(iv) Labor and workforce development.
(4) The founding board convened under subsection (2) of this section shall manage the
founding board’s membership and may fill vacancies on or add additional members to the
founding board. Members added to the founding board under this subsection must meet the
criteria described in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(5) The founding board convened under subsection (2) of this section shall form a
nonprofit entity for the purpose of financing clean energy and resilience projects that facili-
tate:
(a) The generation, production or storage of clean energy or clean fuels;
(b) The conservation or efficient use of energy or fuels;
(c) A reduction in greenhouse gas emissions; or
(d) Improvements in the resilience and availability of infrastructure, natural and working
lands, buildings or communities, with priority given to lower income, tribal, rural or under-
served communities.
(6) The nonprofit entity formed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section must:
(a) Have articles of incorporation that require a supermajority of the entity’s board to
change or amend.
(b) Be able to receive capital in any form from public and private sources.
(c) Report annually to the appropriate committees or interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly on the entity’s activities, results and financial status.
(7) The Oregon Business Development Department shall work with the nonprofit entity
formed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section to explore potential agreements to provide
capitalization or financing to the nonprofit entity, including through the use of the
department’s bonding authority.
(8) The State Department of Energy shall work with the nonprofit entity formed pursu-
[2]

A-Eng. SB 1526
ant to subsection (5) of this section to explore potential contractual relationships and areas
of collaboration.
(9) All state agencies shall assist the State Department of Energy and founding board in
the performance of the department’s and the founding board’s duties and functions under
this section.

[3]